California statutes. Vehicle Code
 not limited to, audible tones, speech messages, and vibrotactile surfaces. These features shall be activated, maintained, and available at all times of the day.

(2) (A) Touch-free APS shall be installed at new signalized pedestrian crossings on capital projects on the state highway system, defined in Section 300 of the Streets and Highways Code, encroachment permit projects, and highway maintenance-funded projects according to the following schedule:

(i) Capital outlay support projects that have a ready to list date.

(ii) Capital outlay support projects that are in construction before October 18, 2021.

(iii) Encroachment permit projects that have been approved on or after October 18, 2021.

(iv) Highway maintenance-funded projects that have a ready to list date on or after October 18, 2021.

(B) (i) When a touch-free APS is installed at an existing signalized pedestrian crossing, or in response to a federal Americans with Disability Act (ADA) access request, on capital projects on the state highway system, all APS at that location shall be upgraded to touch-free APS.

(ii) The installation of touch-free APS shall not require the upgrading of other ADA components, including, but not limited to, curb ramps or sidewalks, unless those components are disturbed.

(3) When performing maintenance and repair activities on capital projects on the state highway system, as defined in Section 300 of the Streets and Highways Code,
 encroachment permit projects, and highway maintenance-funded projects, the maintenance and repair shall consider using touch-free APS.

(4) Unsignalized pedestrian crossings at signalized intersections, including, but not limited to, intersections with free-right turns, may remain unsignalized.

(e) (1) Upon the first placement or replacement of a state-owned or -operated traffic-actuated signal, the traffic-actuated signal shall be installed and maintained to have an LPI and a touch-free APS, in compliance with the California Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices (CA MUTCD). The touch-free APS shall be activated.

(2) Caltrans shall implement LPIs on existing state-owned or -operated traffic-actuated signals capable of being implemented with remote installation or in-person programming when
 maintenance work is done on the intersection in which the traffic-actuated signal is located, if the traffic-actuated signal is in any of the following areas, unless prohibited by the CA MUTCD:

(A) A residential district, as determined by Section 22507.5.

(B) A business district, as defined in Sections 235 and 240.

(C) A business activity district, as defined in Section 22358.9.

(D) A safety corridor, as defined in Section 2B.13 of the CA MUTCD.

(E) A school zone, as defined in Section 1A.13.185 of the CA MUTCD.

(F) Areas with a high concentration of pedestrians and cyclists, as defined in Section 2B.13 and Table 2B.106(CA)
 of the CA MUTCD.

(3) (A) As soon as practicable, all existing state-owned or -operated traffic signals located in the areas described in subparagraphs (A) to (F), inclusive, of paragraph (2) shall be identified and recorded in the Caltrans Management System (TMS) inventory database to assist future annual operational review requirements and coordination with local agencies for delegated signals. LPIs shall be implemented at these existing state-owned or -operated traffic signal locations at the next opportunity for regularly scheduled operational reviews. Traffic signals that have been implemented with LPIs shall be recorded in the TMS inventory database.

(B) As soon as practicable, Caltrans’ district signal operations units shall formally notify, in writing, local agencies operating state-owned traffic-actuated signals in areas described in subparagraphs (A)
 to (F), inclusive, of paragraph (2), about the opportunity to implement LPI on the signals. Additionally, these local agencies shall report their implementation of LPIs at these locations to Caltrans so the locations can be included in the TMS inventory database.

(C) For existing traffic signals not in areas described in subparagraphs (A) to (F), inclusive, of paragraph (2), Caltrans shall follow the same criteria for implementing LPIs in paragraph (2).

(4) Depending on the physical location and traffic conditions, locations where LPIs have been implemented pursuant to this subdivision may restrict turns on red using illuminated blank out signs and enhanced signing. LPIs are to be implemented at existing signals with touch-free APS and pedestrian countdown signals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 326, Sec. 1.   (SB 671)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

21451.

(a) A driver facing a circular green signal shall proceed straight through or turn right or left or make a U-turn unless a sign prohibits a U-turn. Any driver, including one turning, shall yield the right-of-way to other traffic and to pedestrians lawfully within the intersection or an adjacent crosswalk.

(b) A driver facing a green arrow signal, shown alone or in combination with another indication, shall enter the intersection only to make the movement indicated by that green arrow or any other movement that is permitted by other indications shown at the same time. A driver facing a left green arrow may also make a U-turn unless prohibited by a sign. A
 driver shall yield the right-of-way to other traffic and to a pedestrian lawfully within the intersection or an adjacent crosswalk.

(c) A pedestrian facing a circular green signal, unless prohibited by sign or otherwise directed by a pedestrian control signal as provided in Section 21456, may proceed across the roadway within any marked or unmarked crosswalk, but shall yield the right-of-way to vehicles lawfully within the intersection at the time that signal is first shown.

(d) A pedestrian facing a green arrow turn signal, unless otherwise directed by a pedestrian control signal as provided in Section 21456, shall not enter the roadway.

(e) (1) A peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with
 Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, shall not stop a pedestrian for a violation of subdivision (c) or (d) unless a reasonably careful person would realize there is an immediate danger of a collision with a moving vehicle or other device moving exclusively by human power.

(2) This subdivision does not relieve a pedestrian from the duty of using due care for their safety.

(3) This subdivision does not relieve a driver of a vehicle from the duty of exercising due care for the safety of any pedestrian within the roadway.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 957, Sec. 1.   (AB 2147)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

21452.

(a) A driver facing a steady circular yellow or yellow arrow signal is, by that signal, warned that the related green movement is ending or that a red indication will be shown immediately thereafter.

(b) A pedestrian facing a steady circular yellow or a yellow arrow signal, unless otherwise directed by a pedestrian control signal as provided in Section 21456, is, by that signal, warned that there is insufficient time to cross the roadway and shall not enter the roadway.

(c) (1) A peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of
 Part 2 of the Penal Code, shall not stop a pedestrian for a violation of subdivision (b) unless a reasonably careful person would realize there is an immediate danger of a collision with a moving vehicle or other device moving exclusively by human power.

(2) This subdivision does not relieve a pedestrian from the duty of using due care for their safety.

(3) This subdivision does not relieve a driver of a vehicle from the duty of exercising due care for the safety of any pedestrian within the roadway.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 957, Sec. 2.   (AB 2147)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

21453.

(a) A driver facing a steady circular red signal alone shall stop at a marked limit line, but if none, before entering the crosswalk on the near side of the intersection or, if none, then before entering the intersection, and shall remain stopped until an indication to proceed is shown, except as provided in subdivision (b).

(b) Except when a sign is in place prohibiting a turn, a driver, after stopping as required by subdivision (a), facing a steady circular red signal, may turn right, or turn left from a one-way street onto a one-way street. A driver making that turn shall yield the right-of-way to pedestrians lawfully within an adjacent crosswalk
 and to any vehicle that has approached or is approaching so closely as to constitute an immediate hazard to the driver, and shall continue to yield the right-of-way to that vehicle until the driver can proceed with reasonable safety.

(c) A driver facing a steady red arrow signal shall not enter the intersection to make the movement indicated by the arrow and, unless entering the intersection to make a movement permitted by another signal, shall stop at a clearly marked limit line, but if none, before entering the crosswalk on the near side of the intersection, or if none, then before entering the intersection, and shall remain stopped until an indication permitting movement is shown.

(d) Unless otherwise directed by a pedestrian control signal as provided in Section 21456, a pedestrian facing a
 steady circular red or red arrow signal shall not enter the roadway.

(e) (1) A peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, shall not stop a pedestrian for a violation of subdivision (d) unless a reasonably careful person would realize there is an immediate danger of a collision with a moving vehicle or other device moving exclusively by human power.

(2) This subdivision does not relieve a pedestrian from the duty of using due care for their safety.

(3) This subdivision does not relieve a driver of a vehicle from the duty of exercising due care for the safety of any pedestrian within the roadway.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 957, Sec. 3.   (AB 2147)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

21454.

When lane use control signals are placed over individual lanes, those signals shall indicate and apply to drivers of vehicles as follows:

(a) Green indication: A driver may travel in any lane over which a green signal is shown.

(b) Steady yellow indication: A driver is thereby warned that a lane control change is being made.

(c) Steady red indication: A driver shall not enter or travel in any lane over which a red signal is shown.

(d) Flashing yellow indication: A driver may use the lane only for the purpose of making a left turn to or from the highway.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 413, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

21455.

If an official traffic control signal is erected and maintained at a place other than an intersection, including a freeway or highway on ramp, this article applies, except those provisions that by their nature can have no application. A stop required shall be made at a sign, crosswalk, or limit line indicating where the stop shall be made, but, in the absence of that sign or marking, the stop shall be made at the signal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 555, Sec. 1.   (AB 1094)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

21455.5.

(a) The limit line, the intersection, or a place designated in Section 21455, where a driver is required to stop, may be equipped with an automated traffic enforcement system if the governmental agency utilizing the system meets both of the following requirements:

(1) Identifies the system by signs posted within 200 feet of an intersection where a system is operating that clearly indicate the system’s presence and are visible to traffic approaching from all directions in which the automated traffic enforcement system is being utilized to issue citations. A governmental agency utilizing this type of system does not need to post signs visible to traffic approaching the intersection
 from directions not subject to the automated traffic enforcement system.

(2) Locates the system at an intersection and ensures that the system meets the criteria specified in Section 21455.7.

(b) Before issuing citations under this section, a local jurisdiction utilizing an automated traffic enforcement system shall commence a program to issue only warning notices for 30 days. The local jurisdiction shall also make a public announcement of the automated traffic enforcement system at least 30 days before commencing the enforcement program.

(c) Only a governmental agency, in cooperation with a law enforcement agency, may operate an automated traffic enforcement system. A governmental agency that operates an automated traffic
 enforcement system shall do both of the following:

(1) Develop uniform guidelines for screening and issuing violations, including a violation for a prohibited right turn at a steady circular red signal, which shall take into account the relative risk to traffic and pedestrian safety posed by right turns on red compared to proceeding through the intersection against a red signal, and for the processing and storage of confidential information, and establish procedures to ensure compliance with those guidelines.

(2) Perform administrative functions and day-to-day functions, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Establishing guidelines for the selection of a location. Before installing an
 automated traffic enforcement system, the governmental agency shall make and adopt a finding of fact establishing that the system is needed at a specific location for reasons related to safety.

(B) Ensuring that the equipment is regularly inspected.

(C) Certifying that the equipment is properly installed and calibrated, and is operating properly.

(D) Regularly inspecting and maintaining warning signs placed under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(E) Overseeing the establishment or change of signal phases and the timing thereof.

(F) Maintaining controls necessary to ensure that only those citations
 that have been reviewed and approved by law enforcement are delivered to violators.

(d) The activities listed in subdivision (c) that relate to the operation of the system may be contracted out by the governmental agency, if it maintains overall control and supervision of the system. However, the activities listed in paragraph (1) of, and subparagraphs (A), (D), (E), and (F) of paragraph (2) of, subdivision (c) shall not be contracted out to the manufacturer or supplier of the automated traffic enforcement system.

(e) The printed representation of computer-generated information, video, or photographic images stored by an automated traffic enforcement system does not constitute an out-of-court hearsay statement by a declarant under Division 10 (commencing with Section 1200) of
 the Evidence Code.

(f) (1) Notwithstanding Article 1 (commencing with Section 7922.500) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 7922.525) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 10 of Title 1 of the Government Code, or any other law, photographic records made by an automated traffic enforcement system shall be confidential, and shall be made available only to governmental agencies and law enforcement agencies and only for the purposes of this article.

(2) Confidential information obtained from the Department of Motor Vehicles for the administration or enforcement of this article shall be held confidential, and shall not be used for any other purpose.

(3) Except for court records described in Section 68152 of
 the Government Code, the confidential records and information described in paragraphs (1) and (2) may be retained for up to six months from the date the information was first obtained, or until final disposition of the citation, whichever date is later, after which time the information shall be destroyed in a manner that shall preserve the confidentiality of a person included in the record or information.

(g) Notwithstanding subdivision (f), the registered owner or an individual identified by the registered owner as the driver of the vehicle at the time of the alleged violation shall be permitted to review the photographic evidence of the alleged violation.

(h) (1) A contract between a governmental agency and a manufacturer or supplier of automated traffic
 enforcement equipment shall not include provision for the payment or compensation to the manufacturer or supplier based on the number of citations generated, or as a percentage of the revenue generated, as a result of the use of the equipment authorized under this section.

(2) Paragraph (1) does not apply to a contract that was entered into by a governmental agency and a manufacturer or supplier of automated traffic enforcement equipment before January 1, 2004, unless that contract is renewed, extended, or amended on or after January 1, 2004.

(3) A governmental agency that proposes to install or operate an automated traffic enforcement system shall not consider revenue generation, beyond recovering its actual costs of operating the system, as a factor when considering whether or
 not to install or operate a system within its local jurisdiction.

(i) A manufacturer or supplier that operates an automated traffic enforcement system pursuant to this section shall, in cooperation with the governmental agency, submit an annual report to the Judicial Council that includes all of the following information if this information is in the possession of, or readily available to, the manufacturer or supplier:

(1) The number of alleged violations captured by the systems they operate.

(2) The number of citations issued by a law enforcement agency based on information collected from the automated traffic enforcement system.

(3) For citations
 identified in paragraph (2), the number of violations that involved traveling straight through the intersection, turning right, and turning left.

(4) The number and percentage of citations that are dismissed by the court.

(5) The number of traffic collisions at each intersection that occurred before and after the installation of the automated traffic enforcement system.

(j) This section does not affect a local jurisdiction that utilizes an automated traffic enforcement system pursuant to Section 21455.9. A local jurisdiction may utilize an automated traffic enforcement system pursuant to this section or Section 21455.9.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 782, Sec. 4.   (SB 720)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

21455.6.

(a) A city council or county board of supervisors shall conduct a public hearing on the proposed use of an automated enforcement system authorized under Section 21455.5 prior to authorizing the city or county to enter into a contract for the use of the system.

(b) (1) The activities listed in subdivision (c) of Section 21455.5 that relate to the operation of an automated enforcement system may be contracted out by the city or county, except that the activities listed in paragraph (1) of, and subparagraphs (A), (D), (E), or (F) of paragraph (2) of, subdivision (c) of Section 21455.5 may not be contracted out to the manufacturer or supplier of the automated enforcement system.

(2) Paragraph (1) does not apply to a contract that was entered into by a city or county and a manufacturer or supplier of automated enforcement equipment before January 1, 2004, unless that contract is renewed, extended, or amended on or after January 1, 2004.

(c) The authorization in Section 21455.5 to use automated enforcement systems does not authorize the use of photo radar for speed enforcement purposes by any jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 511, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

21455.7.

(a) At an intersection at which there is an automated traffic enforcement system in operation pursuant to Section 21455.5 or 21455.9, the minimum yellow light change interval shall be established in accordance with the California Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), the minimum yellow light change intervals relating to designated approach speeds provided in the California Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices are mandatory minimum yellow light intervals.

(c) A yellow light change interval may exceed the minimum interval established pursuant to subdivision
 (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 782, Sec. 5.   (SB 720)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

21455.9.

(a) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Automated traffic enforcement system” or “system” means a fixed system that utilizes automated equipment to detect a violation of a traffic control signal and obtains a clear photograph of the detected vehicle’s license and video recording of the violation.

(2) “Automated traffic enforcement violation” means a violation of a traffic control signal detected by an automated traffic enforcement system operated pursuant to this section.

(3) “Designated jurisdiction” means any
 city, county, or city and county in the state.

(4) A person is “indigent” if either of the following conditions is met:

(A) The person meets the income criteria set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 68632 of the Government Code.

(B) The person receives public benefits from a program listed in subdivision (a) of Section 68632 of the Government Code.

(5) “Local department of transportation” means a designated jurisdiction’s department of transportation or, if a designated jurisdiction does not have a department of transportation, their administrative division, including, but not limited to, a public works department that administers transportation and traffic
 matters under this code.

(6) “Traffic control signal” means an official traffic control signal, as defined in Section 445.

(b) (1) A designated jurisdiction may establish a program for traffic control signal enforcement that utilizes an automated traffic enforcement system, to be operated by a local department of transportation, at the limit line, the intersection, where a driver is required to stop, if the program meets all of the following requirements:

(A) (i) Identifies the system by signs that clearly indicate the system’s presence, are visible to traffic approaching from all directions in which the automated traffic enforcement system is being utilized to issue
 citations, and are posted within the following distances:

(I) On roads with speed limits of 45 miles per hour or less, one sign within 200 to 300 feet, inclusive, of an intersection where a system is operating.

(II) On roads with speed limits over 45 miles per hour, two signs within 200 to 500 feet, inclusive, of an intersection where a system is operating, with at least 100 feet between the signs.

(ii) A program does not need to post signs visible to traffic approaching the intersection from directions not subject to the automated traffic enforcement system.

(B) Locates the system at an intersection and ensures that the system meets the criteria
 specified in Section 21455.7. A designated jurisdiction shall not reduce the yellow light interval durations after placement of the system.

(2) An automated traffic enforcement system program developed pursuant to paragraph (1) shall place the systems in locations that are geographically and socioeconomically diverse. The designated jurisdiction shall describe how it has complied with this provision in the automated traffic enforcement system impact report described in subdivision (c).

(3) A designated jurisdiction shall consider traffic data or other evidence supporting the installation and operation of each automated traffic enforcement system and determine that the intersection where an automated traffic enforcement system is to be placed or installed constitutes a heightened safety
 risk that warrants additional enforcement measures. A designated jurisdiction shall consider placing an automated traffic enforcement system on a street that has had a high number of incidents for motor vehicle contests or motor vehicle exhibitions of speed. For the purposes of this provision, a high number of incidents shall be calls for law enforcement to respond to the area for at least four separate incidences of a motor vehicle contest or motor vehicle exhibition of speed within the last two years before the placement of the automated traffic enforcement system.

(c) (1) For programs implemented after January 1, 2026, the governing body of the designated jurisdiction shall approve an automated traffic enforcement system impact report. The automated traffic enforcement system impact report shall include all of the following
 information:

(A) Assessment of potential impact of the automated traffic enforcement system on civil liberties and civil rights and any plans to safeguard those public rights.

(B) Description of the automated traffic enforcement system and how it works.

(C) Fiscal costs for the automated traffic enforcement system, including program establishment costs, ongoing costs, and program funding.

(D) If potential deployment locations of systems are predominantly in low-income neighborhoods, a determination of why these locations experience high fatality and injury collisions due to traffic control signal violations at intersections.

(E) Locations where the system may be deployed and traffic data for these locations, including the intersection where the cameras will be located.

(F) Proposed purpose of the automated traffic enforcement system.

(2) The automated traffic enforcement system impact report shall be made available for public review at least 30 calendar days prior to adoption by the governing body at a public hearing.

(3) The governing body of the designated jurisdiction shall consult and work collaboratively with relevant local stakeholder organizations, including racial equity, privacy protection, and economic justice groups, in developing the automated traffic enforcement system
 impact report.

(d) (1) A designated jurisdiction that operates an automated traffic enforcement system shall do both of the following:

(A) Develop uniform guidelines, consistent with the provisions of this section, for both of the following:

(i) The screening and issuing of notices of violation.

(ii) The processing and storage of confidential information and procedures to ensure compliance with confidentiality requirements.

(B) Perform administrative functions and day-to-day functions, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(i) Establishing guidelines for the selection of a location. Prior to installing an automated traffic enforcement system after January 1, 2026, the designated jurisdiction shall make and adopt a finding of fact establishing that the system is needed at a specific location for reasons related to safety.

(ii) Ensuring that the equipment is regularly inspected, but at least annually.

(iii) Calibrating the equipment in accordance with the manufacturer’s instructions upon installation.

(iv) Regularly inspecting and maintaining warning signs placed under paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(v) Overseeing the establishment or change of signal phases and
 the timing thereof.

(vi) Maintaining controls necessary to ensure that only those citations that have been reviewed and approved by the issuing agency are delivered to violators.

(2) The activities listed in paragraph (1) that relate to the operation of the system may be contracted out by a designated jurisdiction, if it maintains overall control and supervision of the system. However, the activities listed in subparagraph (A) of, and clauses (iv), (v), and (vi) of subparagraph (B) of, paragraph (1) shall not be contracted out to the manufacturer or supplier of the automated traffic enforcement system.

(e) (1) A contract between a designated jurisdiction and a manufacturer or supplier of automated
 traffic enforcement equipment or a company providing maintenance and processing services shall not include provision for the payment or compensation to the manufacturer, supplier, or company based on the number of citations generated, or as a percentage of the revenue generated, as a result of the use of the equipment authorized under this section.

(2) A designated jurisdiction that proposes to install or operate an automated traffic enforcement system shall not consider revenue generation, beyond recovering its actual costs of operating the system, as a factor when considering whether or not to install or operate a system within its local jurisdiction

(f) A designated jurisdiction that operates an automated traffic enforcement system pursuant to this section shall, in
 cooperation with the manufacturer or supplier, publish a report that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following information:

(1) The number of alleged violations captured by the systems they operate.

(2) The number of citations issued by the issuing agency based on information collected from the automated traffic enforcement system.

(3) For citations identified in paragraph (2), the number of violations that involved traveling straight through the intersection, turning right, and turning left.

(4) The number and percentage of citations that are dismissed.

(5) The funds generated from
 the automated traffic enforcement systems.

(g) (1) Prior to issuing citations under this section, a designated jurisdiction utilizing an automated traffic enforcement system shall commence a program to issue only warning notices for 60 days. The designated jurisdiction shall also make a public announcement of the automated traffic enforcement system at least 30 days prior to the commencement of the enforcement program.

(2) A notice of violation issued pursuant to this section shall include a clear photograph of the license plate and rear of the vehicle only, and identify the specific section of the Vehicle Code violated, the camera location, and the date and time when the violation occurred. A notice of violation shall, when practical, exclude images inside
 of the rear window area of the vehicle. A notice of violation issued from an automated traffic enforcement system that was installed prior to January 1, 2026, may continue to include pictures of the driver at the discretion of the designated jurisdiction.

(3) The photographic and video evidence stored by an automated traffic enforcement system does not constitute an out-of-court hearsay statement by a declarant under Division 10 (commencing with Section 1200) of the Evidence Code.

(4) (A) Notwithstanding any provision of the California Public Records Act, or any other law, photographic, video, and administrative records made by a system shall be confidential. Public agencies shall use and allow access to these records only for the purposes authorized by this
 section or to assess the impacts of the system. Data about the number of violations issued is not considered an administrative record required to be disclosed by this section.

(B) Confidential information obtained from the Department of Motor Vehicles for the administration of automated traffic enforcement systems and enforcement of this article shall be held confidential and shall not be used for any other purpose. Designated jurisdictions agents shall establish procedures to protect the confidentiality of these records consistent with Section 1808.47.

(C) Except for court records described in Section 68152 of the Government Code, or as provided in subparagraph (D), the confidential records and evidence described in subparagraphs (A) and (B) may be retained for up to 60 days
 after final disposition of the notice of violation. The designated jurisdiction may retain information that a vehicle has been cited and fined for a violation for up to three years. The designated jurisdiction may adopt a retention period of less than 60 days. Administrative records described in subparagraph (A) may be retained for up to 120 days after final disposition of the notice of violation. Notwithstanding any other law, the confidential records and evidence shall be destroyed in a manner that maintains the confidentiality of any person included in the record or evidence.

(D) Photographic and video evidence that is obtained from an automated traffic enforcement system that does not result in the issuance of a notice of violation shall be destroyed within five business days after the decision to not issue a citation has been made.
 The use of facial recognition technology in conjunction with an automated traffic enforcement system shall be prohibited.

(E) Information collected and maintained by a designated jurisdiction to administer a program shall only be used to administer the program, and shall not be disclosed to any other persons, including, but not limited to, any other state or federal government agency or official for any other purpose, except as required by state or federal law, court order, or in response to a subpoena in an individual case or proceeding.

(5) Notwithstanding paragraph (4), the registered owner or an individual identified by the registered owner as the driver of the vehicle at the time of the alleged violation shall be permitted to review and obtain a copy of the photographic or video
 evidence of the alleged violation.

(h) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, a violation of a traffic control signal law pursuant to this chapter that is recorded by an automated traffic enforcement system authorized pursuant to this section shall be subject only to a civil penalty, as provided in paragraph (3), and shall not result in the department suspending or revoking the privilege of a violator to drive a motor vehicle or in a violation point being assessed against the violator.

(2) The automated traffic enforcement system shall capture images of the rear license plate of vehicles that are violating the traffic control signal, and a notice of violation shall only be issued to registered owners of those vehicles based on that evidence.

(3) (A) A civil penalty shall be assessed as follows:

(i) For a violation where no fine has been assessed within the previous three years, by a fine of one hundred dollars ($100).

(ii) For a violation that occurred within three years after a separate previous violation, by a fine of two hundred dollars ($200).

(iii) For a violation that occurred within three years after two separate previous violations, by a fine of three hundred fifty dollars ($350).

(iv) For a violation that occurred within three years after three or more separate previous violations, by a fine of five hundred dollars
 ($500).

(B) No additional processing fees, other than electronic payment processing fees, may be included.

(C) Late fees for unpaid penalties shall not exceed fifty dollars ($50) for the first late fee and one hundred dollars ($100) for any subsequent late fees for the same violation.

(4) A civil penalty shall not be assessed against an authorized emergency vehicle.

(5) A person shall not be assessed a civil penalty if they are subject to criminal penalties for the same act.

(6) The notice of violation shall be in writing and issued to the registered owner of the vehicle within 15 calendar days of the date of
 the violation. The notice of violation shall include all of the following information:

(A) The violation, including reference to the traffic control signal law that was violated.

(B) The date, approximate time, and location where the violation occurred.

(C) The vehicle license number and the name and address of the registered owner of the vehicle.

(D) A clear photograph of the traffic control signal and an internet address where they can access the video recording of the violation based on a unique citation number.

(E) A statement that payment is required to be made no later than 30 calendar
 days from the date of mailing of the notice of violation, or that the violation may be contested pursuant to subdivision (j).

(F) The amount of the civil penalty due for that violation and the procedures for the payment of the civil penalty or for contesting the notice of violation.

(G) An affidavit of nonliability, and information of what constitutes nonliability, information as to the effect of executing the affidavit, and instructions for returning the affidavit to the processor. If the affidavit of nonliability is returned to the processing agency within 30 calendar days of the mailing of the notice of violation, together with proof of a written lease or rental agreement between a bona fide rental company, as defined in Section 1939.01 of the Civil Code, or a personal
 vehicle sharing program, as defined in Section 11580.24 of the Insurance Code,
 that identifies the renter or lessee, the processing agency shall serve or mail a notice of violation to the renter or lessee identified in the affidavit of nonliability. If the affidavit of nonliability is returned to the processing agency within 30 calendar days of the mailing of the notice of violation, together with proof of a copy of a police report indicating the vehicle had been stolen at the time of the violation, the processing agency shall not subject the registered owner to a civil penalty and may issue the notice of violation to the identified renter or lessee.

(H) The processing agency shall mail to the registered owner of a vehicle committing a violation of the traffic control signal law a notice of violation by depositing the notice in the United States mail no later than 15 days after the date of the alleged violation. The
 processing agency shall maintain proof of mailing demonstrating that the notice of violation was mailed to that address. If the registered owner or coowner of the vehicle, or the person designated as having care, custody, or control of the motor vehicle at the time of the violation pursuant to subparagraph (G), initiates a proceeding to challenge the violation pursuant to subdivision (j), such person waives any challenge or dispute as to the delivery of the notice of violation.

(I) An affidavit from a designated jurisdiction that the yellow light change interval was established in accordance with the California Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices, as required
 by Section 21455.7.

(i) (1) Revenues derived from any program utilizing an automated traffic enforcement system shall first be used to recover program costs. Program costs include, but are not limited to, the construction of traffic-calming measures, the installation of automated traffic enforcement systems, the adjudication of violations, and reporting requirements, as specified in this section.

(2) Designated jurisdictions shall maintain their existing commitment of local funds for traffic-calming measures, and shall annually expend not less than the annual average of expenditures for traffic-calming measures during the 2020–21, 2021–22, and 2022–23 fiscal years. For purposes of this subdivision, in calculating average expenditures on